Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 4
VETERANS' HOUSING

29-4-401. Existing statutes no bar to creation of housing authority.

Nothing in any existing statute of the state of Colorado shall prevent cities and towns, however organized, from creating veterans' housing authorities by ordinance.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 882, § 1.

CSA:

C. 82, § 76.

CRS 53:

§ 69-5-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-5-1.

29-4-402. Cities and towns empowered to create housing authorities.

All cities and towns, however organized, by ordinance may create veterans' housing authorities and provide their duties and powers and give preferences to veterans as to all housing constructed, purchased, or leased by or under the direction of such veterans' housing authorities.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 882, § 2.

CSA:

C. 82, § 77.

CRS 53:

§ 69-5-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-5-2.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 914, § 20, effective August 6.

29-4-403. Veterans of world war II defined. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 47:

p. 882, § 3.

CSA:

C. 82, § 78.

CRS 53:

§ 69-5-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-5-3.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 914, § 21, effective August 6.